Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
ARTICLE 19
CHILDREN'S BASIC HEALTH PLAN

26-19-101 to 26-19-113. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article repealed, p. 1997, § 27, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1997. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 2006, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. The provisions of this article were relocated to article 8 of title 25.5. For the location of specific provisions, see the editor's notes following each section in said article and the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Cross references:

For current provisions concerning the children's basic health plan, see article 8 of title 25.5.